Maryland, session 2026, HB1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 27. MARYLAND–AFRICA AND THE CARIBBEAN INVESTMENT AND
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.
5–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “AFRICAN DIASPORA” MEANS INDIVIDUALS OF AFRICAN OR
CARIBBEAN DESCENT RESIDING IN MARYLAND.
(2) “AFRICAN DIASPORA” INCLUDES FIRST–GENERATION
IMMIGRANTS AND THEIR DESCENDANTS.
(C) “BOARD” MEANS THE ADVISORY BOARD ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–2703
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND AFRICAN DIASPORA INVESTMENT AND
DEVELOPMENT FUND.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND–AFRICA AND THE CARIBBEAN
INVESTMENT AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.
5–2702.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND–AFRICA AND THE CARIBBEAN INVESTMENT
AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1371 3
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO STUDY AND PROMOTE THE
INVESTMENT, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BETWEEN THE AFRICAN
DIASPORA IN MARYLAND AND AFRICA AND THE CARIBBEAN REGION.
5–2703.
(A) THERE IS AN ADVISORY BOARD FOR THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE, OR THE MAYOR’S DESIGNEE; AND
(3) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE AFRICAN
DIASPORA BUSINESS COMMUNITY IN MARYLAND;
(II) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATION BASED IN BALTIMORE CITY;
(III) AT LEAST TWO REPRESENTATIVES FROM ACADEMIC
INSTITUTIONS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING ONE FROM A HISTORICALLY BLACK
COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF ORGANIZED LABOR; AND
(V) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE FINANCIAL OR
BUSINESS SECTOR.
(C) THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF THE BOARD SHALL BE ELECTED FROM
AMONG THE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD.
(D) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD;
BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(E) THE GOVERNOR MAY REMOVE AN APPOINTED MEMBER FOR CAUSE.

HOUSE BILL 1371
(F) THE BOARD SHALL STUDY AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
DEPARTMENT REGARDING:
(1) ADVANCING BILATERAL TRADE AND INVESTMENT BETWEEN THE
AFRICAN DIASPORA IN THE STATE AND AFRICA AND THE CARIBBEAN REGION;
(2) INITIATING JOINT ACTION ON POLICY ISSUES OF MUTUAL
INTEREST TO THE AFRICAN DIASPORA IN THE STATE AND AFRICA AND THE
CARIBBEAN REGION;
(3) ENCOURAGING MUTUAL INVESTMENT IN THE INFRASTRUCTURE
OF THE AFRICAN DIASPORA IN THE STATE AND AFRICA AND THE CARIBBEAN
REGION, WITH A FOCUS ON JOB CREATION AND INVESTMENT IN COMMUNITIES IN
NORTHEAST BALTIMORE;
(4) ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM; AND
(5) OTHER ISSUES AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD.
5–2704.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND AFRICAN DIASPORA INVESTMENT AND
DEVELOPMENT FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS, LOW–INTEREST
LOANS, AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO BUSINESSES THAT ARE OWNED DIRECTLY
BY OR IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE AFRICAN DIASPORA.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1371 5
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) GRANTS AND LOANS TO BUSINESSES ELIGIBLE UNDER § 5–2705 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) PROVIDING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND DEVELOPMENT
SERVICES TO BUSINESSES ELIGIBLE UNDER § 5–2705 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) PROVIDING CAPITAL FOR STARTUP AND EXPANSION TO
BUSINESSES ELIGIBLE UNDER § 5–2705 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE DEPARTMENT TO CARRY OUT
THE PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2032, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $10,000,000
TO THE FUND.
5–2705.
(A) TO CARRY OUT THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE BOARD, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY:
(1) ISSUE GRANTS, LOW–INTEREST LOANS, OR CAPITAL TO
BUSINESSES ELIGIBLE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PROVIDE FINANCING FOR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND BUSINESS
SERVICES FOR BUSINESSES ELIGIBLE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1371
(B) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE FUNDS OR SERVICES FROM THE FUND, A
BUSINESS MUST BE:
(1) OWNED BY A MEMBER OF THE AFRICAN DIASPORA; OR
(2) PARTNERED WITH A BUSINESS OWNED BY A MEMBER OF THE
AFRICAN DIASPORA; AND
(3) LOCATED IN NORTHEAST BALTIMORE OR ANOTHER COMMUNITY
DESIGNATED BY THE BOARD.
(C) A BUSINESS THAT RECEIVES FUNDS UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) HIRE AT LEAST 50% OF NEW HIRES FROM THE COMMUNITY IN
WHICH THE BUSINESS IS LOCATED; AND
(2) COMPLY WITH PREVAILING WAGE REQUIREMENTS FOR
CONSTRUCTION AND APPLICABLE CONTRACTS.
(D) A BUSINESS THAT RECEIVES FUNDS UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY NOT
USE THE FUNDS TO:
(1) PAY FOR PASSIVE INVESTMENT;
(2) REFINANCE DEBT; OR
(3) PAY FOR ACTIVITIES RELATED TO LOBBYING, AS DEFINED IN
TITLE 5 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE A BUSINESS THAT RECEIVES FUNDS
UNDER THE PROGRAM BUT FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE PROGRAM
TO RETURN ALL OR A PORTION OF THE FUNDS.
5–2706.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2028, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE PROJECTS FUNDED THROUGH THE PROGRAM;
(2) THE ECONOMIC IMPACT OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE
NUMBER OF JOBS CREATED;

HOUSE BILL 1371 7
(3) THE GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF INVESTMENTS; AND
(4) THE COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT WITH THE PROGRAM.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2031, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) WHETHER THE PROGRAM IS ACHIEVING THE EXPECTED
OUTCOMES;
(2) WHETHER THE PROGRAM SHOULD BE CONTINUED OR
TERMINATED;
(3) ANY CHANGES TO THE PROGRAM SUGGESTED BY THE BOARD; AND
(4) WHETHER THE PROGRAM SHOULD BE EXPANDED.
5–2707.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND

HOUSE BILL 1371
214. THE MARYLAND AFRICAN DIASPORA INVESTMENT
AND DEVELOPMENT FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.